Connecticut, session 2026, HB05461.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsections (c) and (d) of section 15-13 of the general
2 statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
3 (Effective October 1, 2026):
4 (c) Each pilot shall, upon the granting of a license, [pay a fee of thirty
5 dollars to said authority and shall] give a bond of one thousand dollars
6 to the Treasurer and the Treasurer's successors in office, with surety, to
7 the acceptance of the authority, conditioned for the faithful performance
8 of [his or her] such pilot's duties as a pilot, upon which bond suit may
9 be brought in the name of said Treasurer for the benefit of any person
10 who may suffer loss or damage, by reason of the ignorance, neglect or
11 misconduct of such pilot in the discharge of such pilot's duties. [The
12 authority shall increase such fee by fifty per cent July 1, 1985, by an
13 additional fifty per cent effective July 1, 1989, by an additional twenty-
HB5461 / File No. 255 1

HB5461 File No. 255
14 five per cent effective July 1, 1991, and by an additional twenty-five per
15 cent effective July 1, 1993.]
16 (d) Each license shall expire on the last day of December following its
17 issuance and may be renewed upon application, [and payment of the
18 fee required by subsection (c) of this section,] renewal of the bond
19 required under subsection (c) of this section and proof of current federal
20 licensure as required in subsection (a) of this section.
21 Sec. 2. Subsection (d) of section 13b-59 of the general statutes is
22 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
23 1, 2026):
24 (d) "License, permit and fee revenues" means (1) all fees and other
25 charges required by, or levied pursuant to sections 12-487, 13b-80 and
26 13b-97, subsection (b) of section 14-12, sections 14-16a, 14-21c, 14-44h
27 and 14-44i, subsection (v) of section 14-49, subsections (b) and (f) of
28 section 14-50, subdivisions (7) to (9), inclusive, of subsection (a) of
29 section 14-50a, sections 14-52, 14-58, 14-67l and 14-69, subsection (e) of
30 section 14-73, sections 14-96q and 14-103a, subsection (a) of section 14-
31 164a, subsection (a) of section 14-192, subsection (d) of section 14-270,
32 sections 14-319 and 14-320 and sections 13b-410a to 13b-410c, inclusive;
33 (2) all aeronautics, waterways, and other fees and charges required by,
34 or levied pursuant to sections 13a-80 and 13a-80a [,] and subsection (b)
35 of section 13b-42; [and subsections (c) and (d) of section 15-13;] and (3)
36 all motor vehicle related fines, penalties or other charges, as defined in
37 subsection (g) of this section;
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 15-13(c) and (d)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 13b-59(d)
TRA Joint Favorable
HB5461 / File No. 255 2

HB5461 File No. 255
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Connecticut Port Authority CT Port Less than Less than
Authority - 1,000 1,000
Revenue Loss
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in revenue loss to the Connecticut Port Authority of
less than $1,000 annually by eliminating the fee for issuing or renewing
a marine pilot license. The fee is $105.48 and there are currently seven
licensed marine pilots in the state.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of licensed marine pilots
in the state.
HB5461 / File No. 255 3

HB5461 File No. 255
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5461
AN ACT IMPLEMENTING RECOMMENDATIONS BY THE
CONNECTICUT PORT AUTHORITY TO ELIMINATE THE FEES
ASSOCIATED WITH THE MARINE PILOT LICENSE.